District of Columbia statutes.
7-2033

Exemptions.

The provisions of this subchapter shall not apply to the following:

(1)

Occasional babysitting in a babysitter’s home for the children of one family;

(2)

Informal parent-supervised neighborhood play groups;

(3)

Care furnished in places of worship during religious services;

(4)

Care given by an individual who is related to the child, infant, or toddler;

(5)

Child development facilities operated by the federal government on federal government property; however, a private child care provider utilizing space in or on federal government property is not exempt unless federal law specifically exempts the facility from the District’s regulatory authority; or

(6)

Pre-kindergarten education programs licensed pursuant to Chapter 2A of Title 38.

History

Apr. 13, 1999, D.C. Law 12-215, § 4, 46 DCR 274
July 18, 2008, D.C. Law 17-202, § 603(b), 55 DCR 6297

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-3623.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 17-202, in par. (4), deleted “or” from the end; in par. (5), substituted “; or” for a period at the end; and added par. (6).

Temporary Addition of Section

See notes to § 7-2031.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary addition of subchapter, see notes to § 7-2031.